Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Chapter 1

Guardianships and Conservatorships Generally

34-1-101. Chapter 1-3 definitions.

As used in this chapter and chapters 2 and 3 of this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adversary counsel” means a private lawyer hired by a respondent to represent the respondent's interest in any action under this chapter and chapters 2 and 3 of this title;

“Attorney ad litem” means an attorney appointed by the court to act as counsel for the respondent;

“Closest relative” or “closest relatives” means the person or persons who are in the level of intestate heirs nearest to the respondent under the Tennessee laws of intestate succession. If there are two (2) or more closest relatives, all such persons shall be treated equally;

“Conservator” or “co-conservators” means a person or persons or an entity appointed by the court to exercise the decision-making rights and duties of the person with a disability in one or more areas in which the person lacks capacity as determined and required by the orders of the court;

“Conservatorship” is a proceeding in which a court removes the decision-making powers and duties, in whole or in part, in a least restrictive manner, from a person with a disability who lacks capacity to make decisions in one or more important areas and places responsibility for one or more of those decisions in a conservator or co-conservators;

“Corporate surety” means a corporation admitted to do business in the state and licensed under title 56, chapter 2;

“Court” means any court having jurisdiction to hear matters concerning guardians or conservators;

“Fiduciary” means a guardian, coguardian, conservator, co-conservator, or qualified trustee as defined in § 35-16-102(12)(A);

“Financial institution” means a bank as defined by § 45-2-107, a savings and loan association as defined by § 45-3-104, a credit union subject to title 45, chapter 4, or a nonprofit general welfare corporation as defined in § 45-2-105;

“Guardian” or “coguardian” means a person or persons appointed by the court to provide partial or full supervision, protection and assistance of the person or property, or both, of a minor;

“Guardian ad litem” means a person meeting the qualifications set forth in § 34-1-107(c) appointed by the court to investigate the allegations in a petition, perform the duties set forth in § 34-1-107(d) and report to the court with recommendations as to the best interests of the respondent;

“Least restrictive alternatives” means techniques and processes that preserve as many decision-making rights as practical under the particular circumstances for the person with a disability;

“Minor” means any person who has not attained eighteen (18) years of age and who has not otherwise been emancipated;

“Person” means any individual, nonhuman entity or governmental agency;

“Person with a disability” means any person eighteen (18) years of age or older determined by the court to be in need of partial or full supervision, protection, and assistance by reason of mental illness, physical illness or injury, developmental disability, or other mental or physical incapacity;

“Physician” means a medical doctor or doctor of osteopathic medicine who is licensed to practice medicine in the state of Tennessee;

“Property management plan” means the plan submitted by the fiduciary for the investment and management of the property of a minor or person with a disability;

“Psychologist” means a psychologist who is licensed to practice in the state of Tennessee; and

“Respondent” means a person who is a minor or is alleged to be a person with a disability for whom a fiduciary is being sought.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 2; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1996, ch. 811, § 1; T.C.A. §34-11-101; Acts 2010, ch. 831, § 1; 2013, ch. 435, §§ 2-6; 2018, ch. 605, § 1; 2019, ch. 340, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 1, §§34-1-101 —34-1-107 (Acts 1859-1860, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; 1899, ch. 177, § 1; Shan., §§ 4256, 4257, 5868a1; Acts 1923, ch. 41, §§ 1-3; 1927, ch. 79, § 1; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8463-8466, 8472, 8473, 10070; 1951, ch. 23, § 1; 1951, ch. 148, § 1 (Williams, § 8476); 1955, ch. 137, § 1; 1957, ch. 102, § 1, 1959, ch. 147, § 1; 1961, ch. 337, §§ 1, 2; 1963, ch. 48, § 1; 1972, ch. 612, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 675, § 1; 1978, ch. 523, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 662, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 34-101 — 34-103, 34-105, 34-106, 34-108, 34-109; Acts 1984, ch. 668, § 1; 1985, ch. 140, § 30; 1991, ch. 181, § 1), concerning general provisions for guardians, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 52 provided that for each existing guardian or conservator, the provisions of this chapter shall be effective for any act required to be done by the fiduciary and due on or after January 1, 1993; and that each existing limited guardian shall become a guardian or conservator as the case may be, with limited powers on January 1, 1993.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added the definition of “least restrictive alternatives”.

The 2019 amendment added “, or qualified trustee as defined in §35-16-102(12)(A);” at the end of the definition of “fiduciary”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 605, § 2. April 2, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 340, § 20. May 10, 2019.

Law Reviews.

A Quantum Leap for Ethical Guidance: Comparison of the Model Code and Rule 1.14 of the Proposed Rules of Professional Conduct (Donna S. Harkness), 35 No. 11 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1999).

Changes in Tennessee's Guardianship and Conservatorship Statute (Mary D. Colley and Colleen P. Mac Lean), 29 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 14 (1993).

Conservatorship Proceedings and Due Process: Protecting the Elderly in Tennessee (Tricia M. York), 36 U. Mem. L. Rev. 491 (2006).

Survey of the New Tennessee Guardianship and Conservatorship Act, 60 Tenn. L. Rev. (1993).

To Be or Not To Be in Tennessee: Deciding Surrogate Issues, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 333 (2004).

Attorney General Opinions. A dependent or neglected child in the department of children's services' custody without termination of parental rights is not a “ward of the state” under Tennessee law, OAG 02-022, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (2/26/02).

34-1-102. Parents as joint and equal natural guardians of minors — Custody of minors — Support of minors over eighteen (18) years of age in high school — Property of minor — Incapacity of parents — Divorce — Commitment of guardianship to county — Guardianship instrument.

Parents are the joint natural guardians of their minor children, and are equally and jointly charged with their care, nurture, welfare, education and support and also with the care, management and expenditure of their estates. Each parent has equal powers, rights and duties with respect to the custody of each of their minor children and the control of the services and earnings of each minor child; provided, that so much of the net income of each minor child as may be necessary may be expended by a parent (without the necessity of court authorization) for the child's care, maintenance and education. Funds of a minor held by a guardian shall not be expended to relieve or minimize the obligation of the parent or parents to support the minor.

Parents shall continue to be responsible for the support of each child for whom they are responsible after the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age if the child is in high school. The duty of support shall continue until the child graduates from high school or the class of which the child is a member when the child attains eighteen (18) years of age graduates, whichever occurs first.

If either parent dies or is incapable of acting, the guardianship of each minor child shall devolve upon the other parent.

If the parents of a minor child are divorced, the court may award the guardianship of the property of the minor child to the parent who, in the court's judgment, would best serve the welfare of the minor child and the child's estate. The parent appointed guardian of the child's estate may, but does not have to be, the parent with legal custody. The appointment of a parent as legal guardian does not affect the custodial decree of the divorce court except in those situations in which the guardianship of the minor or legal custody is committed to the department of children's services, in which case the order of the court having jurisdiction of the guardian proceedings or custodial proceedings under title 37 shall control.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 67; T.C.A. §34-11-102.

Cross-References. Decree for support of children, §36-5-101.

Juvenile courts and proceedings, parents' liability for support, §37-1-151.

Public administrators and public guardians, title 30, ch. 1, part 4.

Public guardianship for the elderly, title 34, ch. 7.

School age and attendance, §49-6-3001.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 1039.

Law Reviews.

Parent's Cause of Action in Tennessee for Injured Child's Lost Earnings and Services, Expenses, and Lost Society; A Comparative Analysis (Steven W. Feldman), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 83 (1983).

34-1-103. Duties of department of children's services when no natural guardian, or child abandoned.

When there is no natural guardian of a minor or when a minor has been abandoned and if the minor requires service from the department of children's services, the duly authorized agent of the commissioner of children's services of the county in which the minor resides may act as the custodian of the person of the minor with the powers as enumerated in § 37-1-140, until a guardian is appointed.

The guardianship of the minor may be committed to the duly authorized agent of the commissioner by an instrument in writing signed:

If both parents are then living, by the parents of the child or, if either parent of the child is dead, by the surviving parent;

If either one (1) of the parents has abandoned or neglected to provide for the minor for a period of six (6) months, by the other parent; or

If the minor is born out of wedlock, by the mother of such minor.

The guardianship shall be in accordance with this section and the instrument shall be upon the terms, time and conditions agreed upon by the parties.

The instrument shall be:

Signed;

Acknowledged before a notary public or county clerk; and

Recorded in the office of the county clerk in the county where the instrument is executed, where the minor is residing, or where the county office of the department of children's services is located.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 4; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 67, 68; T.C.A. §34-11-103.

Cross-References. Infant prematurely born alive during abortion declared abandoned child, custody, §39-15-207.

34-1-104. Letters of guardianship or conservatorship — Disposition of funds of minor under $25,000 — Discharge of paying entities — Order of distribution — Distribution of funds —
Direction of funds into trust.

Except as provided in subsections (b)-(d), no person shall undertake the administration of the estate of a minor or person with a disability until the person has been issued letters of guardianship or letters of conservatorship; provided, that no guardian or conservator shall be appointed if the property of the minor or person with a disability is deposited with the clerk of the court subject to distribution on order of the court. The letters of conservatorship shall either:

Recite the specific powers to be exercised by the conservator and the specific powers retained by the person with a disability; or

Have attached to them the order or orders of the court specifying the powers to be exercised by the conservator and the powers retained by the person with a disability.

If the total property of a minor or person with a disability does not exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and the court determines it is in the best interest of the minor or person with a disability, the court may order any person holding property belonging to the minor or person with a disability to deliver all or any part of the money or property, without the necessity of the appointment of a fiduciary, to the natural guardian or guardians of the minor or to the person with whom the minor or person with a disability resides or to the person with a disability. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the guardians of the minor are the parents of the minor and are divorced or legally separated from each other, the court may order that the funds be delivered, all or in part, to either of the parents if the court finds that such order would best serve the welfare of the minor. The receipt by any of these persons of the money or property discharges the paying entity from further liability. To bring the matter before the court, any person may petition the court for an order of distribution. The petition shall set forth the information required by § 34-2-104 and § 34-3-104, except the petition shall request distribution according to this section instead of the appointment of a fiduciary. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to assist it in determining the best interest of the minor or person with a disability.

In any judicial proceeding in which any fund or part of the fund is decreed to belong to a minor or person with a disability, or in which there is a recovery in favor of a minor or person with a disability, the court trying the case may retain the fund or recovery or part of the fund or recovery to be disbursed by the clerk and master or clerk of the court for the support, maintenance or education of the minor or person with a disability under the orders of the court; provided, that the fund or part of the fund or the amount of the recovery does not exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and the minor is without a legal guardian; and provided further, that the court, in its discretion, may direct the fund to be paid to the natural guardian of the minor or the other person having the care and custody of the minor or person with a disability to be applied for the support, maintenance or education of the minor or person with a disability, subject to such terms and conditions as the court may impose.

In a proceeding to determine letters of guardianship or conservatorship, the court shall be vested with the authority to direct any fund or part of the fund decreed to belong to a minor or person with a disability, or in which there is recovery in favor of a minor or person with a disability, into a trust created under the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code, compiled in title 35, chapter 15 with such fiduciary appointed upon order of the court according to this chapter.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 5; 1994, ch. 855, § 1; T.C.A. §34-11-104; Acts 2008, ch. 958, § 1; 2008, ch. 1204, § 1; 2013, ch. 435, §§ 7, 46; 2019, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; 2019, ch. 340, §§ 4, 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by ch. 197, substituted “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)” for “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000)” near the beginning of the first sentence of (b) and in the first proviso of (c).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 340, substituted “subsections (b)-(d)” for “subsections (b) and (c)” in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph of (a); and added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 197, § 8. April 25, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 340, § 20. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Shares of infants in partition sales, §29-27-218.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 641.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1253 (1961).

34-1-105. Bond.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), bond shall be required of the fiduciary in an amount equal to the sum of the fair market value of all personal property and the amount of the anticipated income from all property, including the real property, for one (1) year. If the surety for the bond is posted by a corporate surety, the amount of the surety shall equal the amount of the bond. If the surety for the bond is posted by pledging property, the value of the unencumbered property posted shall be equal to one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the bond.

If the property pledged to secure the bond is personal property, the property shall be delivered to the clerk for safekeeping. If the property pledged to secure the bond is real property, notice of the pledge shall be recorded in the register's office of the county in which the real property is located.

The bond shall be renewed annually by the fiduciary. The court may adjust the amount of required bond to reflect changes in the value of the property of the minor or person with a disability. The surety's liability under the bond shall not be cumulative and shall not exceed the amount of the bond in force at the time of default.

In the discretion of the court, bond may be excused if the court makes a finding, which finding shall be stated in the order, that the requirement of bond would be unjust or inappropriate in that case and that one (1) of the following exists:

The fiduciary is a financial institution excused from the requirement of bond under § 45-2-1005;

The total fair market value of the minor's non-real estate property or the person with a disability's non-real estate property does not exceed the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and the court finds the benefit to the ward by saving the expense outweighs the risks incident to the absence of a bond;

The document naming the suggested or preferred fiduciary excuses the fiduciary from posting bond;

The property of the minor or person with a disability is placed with a financial institution and the fiduciary and the financial institution enter into a written agreement, filed with the court, in which the financial institution agrees it will not permit the fiduciary to withdraw the principal without court approval;

The property of the minor or person with a disability is deposited with the clerk and master or clerk of the court; or

The fiduciary is appointed fiduciary over the person of the minor or person with a disability but has not also been appointed as fiduciary over the person's estate.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 6; T.C.A. §34-11-105; 2013, ch. 435, §§ 38, 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Action on bond by party aggrieved, §20-1-103.

Law Reviews.

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

34-1-106. Petition for appointment of fiduciary.

The petition for the appointment of a fiduciary shall be served in accordance with the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure. The guardian ad litem appointed may serve the petition on the respondent.

Notice by certified mail with return receipt requested shall be given by the clerk of the court to the closest relative or relatives of the respondent required to be named in the petition and to the person, if any, having care or custody of the respondent, institution, or residential provider with whom the respondent is living.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 7; 1994, ch. 855, § 2; T.C.A. §34-11-106; Acts 2007, ch. 8, § 7; 2013, ch. 435, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

34-1-107. Guardian ad litem.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem in any proceeding and, except as provided in this section, shall appoint a guardian ad litem on filing of a petition for appointment of a fiduciary. If the respondent is represented by counsel who has made an appearance for the respondent, the court may appoint or continue the services of a guardian ad litem or may waive appointment or terminate the services of a guardian ad litem in the best interests of the respondent.

The court may waive the appointment of a guardian ad litem if the petitioner or at least one (1) of the petitioners for the appointment is:

A parent of the minor for whom a guardian is sought;

A minor who has attained fourteen (14) years of age; or

An adult respondent.

The court may waive the appointment of a guardian ad litem if the court determines the waiver is in the best interests of the minor or person with a disability.

If the guardian ad litem is to be appointed, the appointment shall be made no later than ten (10) days from the date the petition for the appointment of the fiduciary was filed.

The person appointed guardian ad litem shall be a lawyer licensed to practice in the state of Tennessee. If there are insufficient lawyers within the court's jurisdiction for the appointment of a lawyer as guardian ad litem, the court may appoint a nonlawyer.

The guardian ad litem owes a duty to the court to impartially investigate the facts and make a report and recommendations to the court. The guardian ad litem serves as an agent of the court, and is not an advocate for the respondent or any other party.

In each proceeding, the guardian ad litem shall:

Verify that the respondent and each other person required to be served or notified was served or notified;

Consult with the respondent in person as soon as possible after appointment;

If possible, explain in language understandable to the respondent the:

Substance of the petition;

Nature of the proceedings;

Respondent's right to protest the petition;

Identity of the proposed fiduciary; and

Respondent's rights as set forth in § 34-3-106; and

Make a report and recommendations to the court concerning the issues of:

Whether a fiduciary should be appointed for the respondent;

If a fiduciary should be appointed, whether the proposed fiduciary is the appropriate person to be appointed; and

Any other matters as directed by the court.

In a proceeding for the appointment of a conservator, the guardian ad litem shall investigate the physical and mental capabilities of the respondent. The guardian ad litem's investigation shall include:

An in-person interview with the respondent; and

A review of the sworn report required by § 34-3-105 to verify that the sworn statement contains:

A detailed description of the respondent's physical or mental conditions or both that may render the respondent a person with a disability; and

A detailed description of how the respondent's physical or mental conditions or both may impair the respondent's ability to function normally.

In a proceeding seeking the appointment of a fiduciary to manage the respondent's property, the guardian ad litem shall investigate the:

Nature and extent of the respondent's property; and

Financial capabilities and integrity of the proposed fiduciary. In evaluating the financial capabilities of the proposed fiduciary, the guardian ad litem may take such actions as directed by the court and as the guardian ad litem deems necessary, which may include but are not limited to:

Obtaining and reviewing the proposed fiduciary's credit report;

Inquiring into whether and to what extent the proposed fiduciary has previous experience in managing assets of the same or similar type and value as the respondent's assets;

Inquiring into how the proposed fiduciary plans to manage the respondent's assets;

Inquiring into whether the proposed fiduciary has previously borrowed funds from the respondent or received any financial assistance or benefits from the respondent; and

Interview any persons with knowledge and review any documents pertinent to the financial capabilities and integrity of the proposed fiduciary.

The order appointing the guardian ad litem shall authorize the guardian ad litem access to records of the respondent in any financial institution and to review medical records, and permit the guardian ad litem to discuss the respondent's physical and mental conditions with any physician, psychologist or other health care provider who may have pertinent information.

The guardian ad litem shall make a written report to the court at least three (3) days prior to the date set for hearing the matter, which time period may be waived in the judge's discretion. The written report shall provide the court with the results of the guardian ad litem's investigation. The guardian ad litem's report shall specifically state whether:

The respondent wants to contest:

The need for a fiduciary;

Merely the person to be the fiduciary; or

Neither;

If the respondent wants to contest any portion of the proceeding and the guardian ad litem's opinion is that there should be a fiduciary appointed, the guardian ad litem shall identify the adversary counsel or indicate there is none and request the appointment of an attorney ad litem;

A fiduciary should be appointed and, if so, whether:

The proposed fiduciary should be appointed; or

Someone else, identified by the guardian ad litem, should be appointed;

The proposed property management plan should be adopted and, if not, what changes should be considered.

The respondent will attend the hearing and, if, in the opinion of the guardian ad litem, it is not in the respondent's best interest to attend, why.

Unless the court orders otherwise, the guardian ad litem has no continuing duty once an order has been entered disposing of the petition that caused the guardian ad litem's appointment.

When investigating financial records of a respondent, the guardian ad litem shall be the customer within the meaning set forth in title 45, chapter 10, known as the Financial Records Privacy Act.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 8; T.C.A. §34-11-107; Acts 2004, ch. 771, § 1; 2007, ch. 26, § 1; 2013, ch. 435, §§ 9-13, 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Appointment of guardian ad litem in chancery court, §21-1-701.

Chancery court jurisdiction, title 16, ch. 11, part 1.

Restrictions on appointment of nonresident, §35-50-107.

Law Reviews.

A Quantum Leap for Ethical Guidance: Comparison of the Model Code and Rule 1.14 of the Proposed Rules of Professional Conduct (Donna S. Harkness), 35 No. 11 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1999).

34-1-108. Hearings on petitions — Notice.

Except as provided in subsection (b), the hearing on a petition shall be held not less than seven (7) nor more than sixty (60) days from the date of service on the respondent or the date the guardian ad litem was appointed, whichever is later. The hearing date may be extended on motion showing good cause.

If the petition alleges the minor or person with a disability is faced with a life threatening situation, the court may schedule the hearing in less than seven (7) days from the date of service on the respondent; provided, that actual notice of the hearing is given to the closest relative and the respondent.

In a proceeding for the appointment of a conservator, a notice of the hearing shall be served on the respondent and any person, institution or residential provider having care or custody of the respondent by the guardian ad litem or as otherwise authorized under the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure. The notice of hearing shall be substantially in the following form:

IN THE COURT OF , TENNESSEE AT IN THE MATTER OF Respondent No. NOTICE OF HEARING TO: SERVICE ADDRESS You are notified that a petition has been filed, a copy of which is attached, in which it is alleged that you are incapable of caring for yourself or disabled from managing your property, or both. The petition seeks the appointment of a conservator for your person or property, or both. The court, being satisfied that there is good cause for the exercise of jurisdiction as to the matters alleged in the petition, has set a hearing on at o'clock in the offices or the courtroom of the Honorable , judge of this court. The court has appointed a guardian ad litem to investigate these matters and make a report to the court. The guardian ad litem is charged with asserting your best interests and making recommendations, consistent with law, as to what action should be taken in your best interests. The name, address and telephone number of the guardian ad litem is: A list of your rights in connection with the above described hearing is attached or printed on the reverse side of this notice. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have hereunto set my hand and affixed the seal of the court at my office on . Clerk and Master or Clerk

Click to view form.

The notice shall contain on the reverse side or on an attached sheet those rights set out in § 34-3-106.

The notice shall also be served upon the closest relative or relatives of the respondent, as such persons are described in title 31, chapter 2, but not including the petitioner, and upon the person or institution, if any, having care and custody of the respondent or with whom the respondent is living. Service by mail, sent to the last known address of such persons or institution, shall be sufficient for purposes of this subdivision (c)(3).

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 9; T.C.A. 34-11-108; 2013, ch. 435, §§ 14, 15, 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

34-1-109. When fiduciary's appointment becomes effective — Evidence of appointment — Liability — Fiduciary oath.

On the entry of an order appointing the fiduciary, the administration of the oath as provided in subsection (b) and the posting of any required bond, the fiduciary's appointment becomes effective. The only effective evidence of appointment shall be duly issued letters of guardianship or conservatorship. Except for violations of § 39-14-101, the fiduciary shall have no liability for any act done pursuant to the order appointing the fiduciary between the date of the entry of the order and the date of the vacation of the order if the order is set aside on appeal.

Before delivering the letters of guardianship or conservatorship, the clerk shall administer to the fiduciary an oath for the faithful performance of the fiduciary's duties. If the fiduciary is a fiduciary of the minor's or person with a disability's property, the fiduciary's faithful performance oath shall include a promise to timely file each required inventory and accounting and to spend the assets of the minor or person with a disability only as approved by the court. If there is more than one (1) fiduciary and any of the fiduciaries is not a resident of the county in which the court supervising the proceedings is located, the oath of the non-resident fiduciary may be sworn or affirmed in the presence of a notary public and the acknowledgment of the fiduciary's oath, when certified by the notary public, shall be presented to the appropriate clerk. At least one (1) fiduciary's oath shall be taken by the clerk.

The social security number of the respondent shall be given to the duly appointed fiduciary and used in any other manner approved by the court. The court may release the social security number to a third party upon good cause shown and upon conditions that the court may deem appropriate.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 10; 1994, ch. 855, § 3; T.C.A. §34-11-109; Acts 2004, ch. 866, § 11; 2007, ch. 26, § 2; 2013, ch. 435, §§ 34, 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 79, 542, 562, 569, 586, 608, 690, 1039.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-503, 4-505, 4-506.

34-1-110. Management of property — Inventory — Filing — Failure to file or appear — Revocation of authority.

If the fiduciary is to manage the property of the minor or person with a disability, within sixty (60) days after appointment, the fiduciary shall file a sworn inventory containing a list of the property of the minor or person with a disability, together with the approximate fair market value of each property and a list of the source, amount and frequency of each item of income, pension, social security benefit or other revenue. If the required information was included in the petition but not separately stated as an inventory, the inventory shall repeat the information provided in the petition and add any later discovered property or income sources.

Unless the court has approved an extension of time for filing the inventory, if the fiduciary fails to file the inventory within the required time, the clerk shall promptly notify the fiduciary and the fiduciary's attorney of record. If after notice the inventory has not been filed thirty (30) days thereafter, the clerk shall cite the fiduciary to appear on a date certain and render the inventory. Upon failure to appear as cited, the fiduciary shall be summoned to appear before the court and show cause why the fiduciary should not be held in contempt.

Unless the court has authorized an extension of time to file the inventory, if a fiduciary who has been summoned does not respond within thirty (30) days of the date the summons was received by the fiduciary, the court may enter an order revoking the fiduciary's authority and appointing a substitute fiduciary.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 11; T.C.A. §34-11-110; Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.